New York, session 2025-2026, A4137.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3602-c of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 2-d to read as follows: 3 2-d. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, students 4 who are entitled to attend the public schools of the state without the 5 payment of tuition pursuant to section thirty-two hundred two of this 6 chapter, and who are home-schooled, shall, upon the written request of 7 the parent or person in parental relation to any such student, apply to 8 the board of education of the school district in which the student 9 resides, for the purpose of attending career education classes, as 10 defined in paragraph c of subdivision one of this section, at local 11 boards of cooperative educational services. Such requests shall be filed 12 before the fifteenth day of April preceding the school year for which 13 the request is made. The board of education or trustee of a school 14 district may establish and adopt a policy to allow a student who 15 receives home instruction to attend such career education classes. The 16 policy shall include, but not be limited to the following provisions: 17 a. the student shall be required to meet all the same responsibilities 18 and standards of behavior and eligibility as a public school student 19 enrolled in the school district attending such career education classes 20 including but not limited to the health examination and immunization 21 requirements; 22 b. the student shall annually meet all academic requirements pursuant 23 to section 100.10 of commissioner regulations; provided, however, that a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05100-01-5 A. 4137 2 1 board of education or trustee of a school district may require addi- 2 tional academic eligibility requirements; and 3 c. transportation shall only be provided to such students from the 4 school a school bus departs from to transport students to boards of 5 cooperative educational services and back. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.